Connecticut, session 2026, SB00425.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
"state agency" means any department, board, council, commission,
institution or other agency in the executive branch of state government,
including, but not limited to, each constituent unit.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, each state
agency shall develop and implement an annual performance plan that
outlines the state agency's strategic and operational goals. The Office of
Policy and Management shall establish guidelines for the performance
plans and shall provide training and technical assistance in performance
plan development and implementation to state agencies upon request.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, each state
agency shall report on the state agency's performance plan and its
progress in attaining the strategic and operational goals outlined in the
state agency's performance plan from the prior year to the Office of
Policy and Management, and shall concomitantly submit a copy of such
report to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of such agency, in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a of the general statutes, except in the case of the Office of State
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 425
Ethics, Freedom of Information Commission, State Elections
Enforcement Commission, State Contracting Standards Board, Office of
Governmental Accountability and Public Utilities Regulatory
Authority, such report shall only be submitted to such committee and
not to said office. The Office of Policy and Management shall institute
regular performance evaluations of state agencies other than the Office
of State Ethics, Freedom of Information Commission, State Elections
Enforcement Commission, State Contracting Standards Board, Office of
Governmental Accountability and Public Utilities Regulatory
Authority, concerning their progress toward attaining the goals
outlined in their performance plans and such evaluations shall occur not
less than every two years.
(d) After receipt of a report submitted under subsection (c) of this
section, each joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of any state agency that issued a report under subsection (c)
of this section shall hold a hearing where the executive authority, as
defined in section 4-37e of the general statutes, of the state agency shall
present the state agency's performance plan.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (b), references to "plan" were changed to "performance plan"
for consistency, and Subsec. (c) was reworded for clarity.
GOS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2